Utah statutes.
63G-6-702 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Selection committee for architect-engineer services.

In the procurement of architect-engineer services, the chief procurement officer or the head of a purchasing agency shall encourage firms engaged in the lawful practice of their profession to submit annually a statement of qualifications and performance data.  The Building Board shall be the selection committee for architect-engineer services contracts under its authority.  Selection committees for architect-engineer services contracts not under the authority of the Building Board shall be established in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the policy board.  Selection committees shall evaluate current statements of qualifications and performance data on file with the state, together with those that may be submitted by other firms in response to the announcement of the proposed contract.  Selection committees shall consider no less than three firms and then shall select therefrom, based upon criteria established and published by the selection committees, no less than three of the firms considered to be the most highly qualified to provide the services required.

